Washington statutes.
RCW 38.42.130

Civil action—Person aggrieved.

(1) Any person aggrieved by a violation of this chapter may in a civil action:

(a) Obtain any appropriate equitable or declaratory relief with respect to the violation; and

(b) Recover all other appropriate relief, including monetary damages.

(2) The court may award to a person aggrieved by a violation of this chapter who prevails in an action brought under this section the costs of the action, including reasonable attorneys' fees.

[ 2018 c 197 s 2; 2014 c 65 s 4.]